Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-523
Grounds; abandonment; sale; objections; reply.

Any person desiring to oppose the said application may, within the time specified in such notice, which shall not be sooner than the third Monday nor longer than the fifth Monday next after the last publication thereof, file a statement of his objections duly verified, and the said applicant may on or before the second Monday after the time specified for filing such objection, reply thereto, which reply shall be verified.

Laws 1907, c. 27, § 3, p. 148;

R.S.1913, § 690;

C.S.1922, § 599;

C.S.1929, § 13-512;

R.S.1943, § 12-523.